Utah statutes.
63G-9-206.   Witnesses -- Subpoena -- Examination -- Fees.

The president of the board may issue subpoenas and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers before the board or any member thereof; and any member of the board may administer oaths and may examine witnesses.  Whenever a witness is subpoenaed before the board to testify against any claim pending before it, the board may allow a reasonable fee to such witness for attendance, which fee must not exceed the fees allowed by law to witnesses in civil cases, and must be paid out of the appropriation for the contingent expenses of the board; provided, that in no instance shall a fee be allowed to a witness who has appeared in behalf of a claimant.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

